Utah statutes.
17-41-402.5.   Limits on political subdivisions with respect to a vested
mining use -- Exception.
(1)  A political subdivision may not:
(a)  terminate a vested mining use, whether by amortization, the exercise of
police power, or otherwise;
(b)  prohibit, restrict, or otherwise limit a mine operator with a vested
mining use from exercising the rights permitted under this chapter;
(c)  require, for a vested mining use:
(i)  a variance;
(ii)  a conditional use permit;
(iii)  a special exception;
(iv)  the establishment or determination of a nonconforming use right; or
(v)  any other type of zoning or land use permit; or
(d)  prohibit, restrict, limit, or otherwise regulate a vested mining use
under a variance, conditional use permit, special exception, or other zoning
or land use permit issued before May 12, 2009.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not prohibit a political subdivision from requiring a
vested mining use to comply with the generally applicable, reasonable health
and safety regulations and building code adopted by the political subdivision
including a drinking water protection zone as defined and limited to
Subsection 19-4-113(4)(a) and (b).
